Missouri, session 2026, HB2014.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, and program described herein for the item or items stated, and
for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period ending June
30, 2026, as follows:
PART 1
Section 14.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item
or items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 2
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of
this act shall consist of guidance to the Department of Elementary
and Secondary Education, Department of Mental Health, the
Department of Health and Senior Services, and the Department
of Social Services in implementing the appropriations found in
Part 1 and Part 2 of this act.
Section 14.005. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For State Board of Education operated school programs
Expense and Equipment
From Elementary and Secondary Education - Federal Fund (1105) .........................$3,000,000
Section 14.010. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the purpose of supporting safe schools programs pursuant to Section
160.664, RSMo
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$97,524
Section 14.015. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For a program identifying where students may lack adequate access to
resources and support
Program Distribution
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ............................................................$320,000
Section 14.020. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For distributions to providers of career and technical education programs
From Elementary and Secondary Education - Federal Fund (1105) .........................$3,600,000
Section 14.025. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 3
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Comprehensive Literacy Development Program
Program Distribution
From Elementary and Secondary Education - Federal Fund (1105) .........................$3,200,000
Section 14.030. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For facilitating the identification, enrollment, attendance, and success in
school of homeless children and youths under Title IX, Part A of
the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as
amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015
From Elementary and Secondary Education - Federal Fund (1105) ............................$951,299
Section 14.035. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the School
Turnaround Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$73,450
Section 14.040. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the School Turnaround Program
Program Distribution
From School Turnaround Fund (1439) ...........................................................................$73,450
Section 14.045. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Adult Learning and Rehabilitation Services
For the Vocational Rehabilitation Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,222,747
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ...................................................... 8,212,685
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,435,432
Section 14.050. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 4
For the Special Education Program
From Elementary and Secondary Education - Federal Fund (1105) .......................$20,000,000
Section 14.055. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For special education excess costs
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$14,705,004
Section 14.060. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the Early Childhood Special Education Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$35,100,217
Section 14.066. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Division of Workforce Development
For job training and related activities
Program Distribution
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ...................................................$4,300,000
Section 14.070. To the Department of Revenue
For collecting highway related fees and taxes
Expense and Equipment
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ............................$943,500
Section 14.075. To the Department of Revenue
For refunds for overpayment or erroneous payment of any tax or any
payment credited to the General Revenue Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$225,600,000
Section 14.080. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund in the amount of sixty-six hundredths
percent of the funds received
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................................$9,076
Section 14.085. To the Department of Revenue

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 5
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund in the amount of sixty-six hundredths
percent of the funds received
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................................$9,076
Section 14.090. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable
to the General Revenue Fund, to the State Highways and
Transportation Department Fund, for reimbursement of
collection expenditures in excess of the three percent (3%) limit
established by Article IV, Sections 29, 30(a), 30(b), and 30(c) of
the Constitution of Missouri
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,058,741
Section 14.095. To the Department of Revenue
For the State Lottery Commission
For payments to vendors for costs of the design, manufacture, licensing,
leasing, processing, and delivery of games administered by the
State Lottery Commission, excluding any purposes for which
appropriations have been made in House Bill 4, Section 4.180,
Lines 8-11 and Lines 16-23, an Act of the 103rd General
Assembly, First Regular Session
From Lottery Enterprise Fund (1657) ........................................................................$1,085,495
Section 14.100. To the Department of Revenue
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Lottery
Enterprise Fund
From State Lottery Fund (1682) ................................................................................$1,085,495
Section 14.105. To the Department of Transportation
For the Highways and Transportation Commission and Highway
Program Administration, provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 14.105, 14.110, and
14.115
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,587,893
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,485,389
From State Road Fund (1320) (Not to exceed 79.23 F.T.E.) .....................................$7,073,282
Section 14.110. To the Department of Transportation

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 6
For the Construction Program
To pay the cost of reimbursing counties and other political
subdivisions for the acquisition of roads and bridges taken over
by the state as permanent parts of the state highway system, and
for the costs of locating, relocating, establishing, acquiring,
constructing, reconstructing, widening, and improving those
highways, bridges, tunnels, parkways, travelways, tourways, and
coordinated facilities authorized under Article IV, Section30(b)
of the Constitution of Missouri, and for acquiring materials,
equipment, and buildings necessary for such purposes and for
other purposes and contingencies relating to the location and
construction of highways and bridges; and to expend funds from
the United States Government for like purposes, provided twenty
percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 14.105,
14.110, and 14.115
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$20,723,471
Expense and Equipment .................................................................................10,361,735
Construction ............................................................................................. 487,001,563
From State Road Fund (1320) (Not to exceed 283.43 F.T.E.) ...............................$518,086,769
Section 14.115. To the Department of Transportation
For the Maintenance Program
For preserving and maintaining the state system of roads and bridges and
coordinated facilities authorized under Article IV, Section 30(b)
of the Constitution of Missouri and for acquiring materials,
equipment, and buildings necessary for such purposes and for
other purposes and contingencies related to the preservation,
maintenance, and safety of highways and bridges, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and provided twenty percent (20%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 14.105, 14.110, and
14.115
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$43,489,318
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 74,049,379
From State Road Fund (1320) (Not to exceed 780.18 F.T.E.) ...............................$117,538,697
Section 14.120. To the Office of Administration
For the America 250 Missouri Celebration
Expense and Equipment

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 7
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ..............................................................$25,000
Section 14.125. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division
For the Department of Public Safety
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) ..........................................................$2,029,630
Section 14.130. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Asset Management
For any and all expenditures necessary for funding the operations of the
Board of Public Buildings, state-owned and leased office
buildings, institutional facilities, laboratories, and support
facilities
Expense and Equipment
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ..................................$4,766,274
Section 14.131. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Asset Management
For the Fletcher Daniel state office building leased parking spaces
Expense and Equipment
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) .......................................$36,000
Section 14.135. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For debt service and all related expenses associated with the Missouri
State Fair project bonds issued in one or more series by the
Missouri Development Finance Board, with a term for each series
not to exceed twenty years and annual debt service for all series
payable in any year not to exceed $4,200,000, to fund not to
exceed $55,000,000 of the costs to plan, design, construct,
renovate, acquire land, upgrade a livestock support barn and a
stalling barn at the Missouri State Fair pursuant to a financing
agreement between the Missouri Development Finance Board
and the Office of Administration, provided one-hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between the General Revenue Fund
and other funds in this section

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 8
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,200,000
From State Fair Fee Fund (1410) ......................................................................... 1
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,200,001
Section 14.140. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds for state employees and participating political
subdivisions to the OASDHI Contributions Fund
From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................$1,147,204
Section 14.145. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds for the state's contribution to the Missouri State
Employees' Retirement System to the State Retirement
Contributions Fund
From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................$2,851,170
Section 14.150. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds for the state's contribution to the Missouri
Consolidated Health Care Plan to the Missouri Consolidated
Health Care Plan Benefit Fund
From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................$1,330,244
For transferring funds for the state's contribution to the Missouri
Consolidated Health Care Plan to the Missouri Consolidated
Health Care Plan Benefit Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 10,500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,830,244
Section 14.155. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the provision of workers' compensation benefits to state employees
through either a self-insurance program administered by the
Office of Administration and/or by contractual agreement with a
private carrier, and for administrative and legal expenses
authorized, in part, by Section 105.810, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,400,000
Section 14.160. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable
to various funds, amounts paid from the General Revenue Fund

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 9
for workers' compensation benefits provided to employees paid
from these other funds, to the General Revenue Fund
From Other Funds (Various) .........................................................................................$400,000
Section 14.165. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Animal Health
Expense and Equipment
From Animal Health Laboratory Fee Fund (1292) .......................................................$400,000
Section 14.167. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For a grant to a public university with an established partnership with a
not-for-profit organization that has received a similar state
funded grant for establishing Missouri in re-shoring active
pharmaceutical ingredient (API) manufacturing
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,927,554
Section 14.170. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Economic Distress Zone Fund (1816) ...................................................................$60,000
Section 14.175. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the FIFA World Cup Grant Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ........................................$59,522,190
Section 14.180. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Counter-Unmanned Aircraft Systems Grant Program
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$50,000
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 14,190,568
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ........................................$14,240,568
Section 14.181. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 10
For statewide fentanyl and additional dangerous narcotics testing of
wastewater for law enforcement activities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 14.185. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For reimbursing SAFE-Care providers for performing forensic medical
exams on children suspected of having been physically abused
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$180,000
Section 14.190. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Administration
Expense and Equipment
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ............................$200,000
Section 14.195. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For fringe benefits, including retirement contributions for members of
the Missouri Department of Transportation and Highway Patrol
Employees' Retirement System, and insurance premiums
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$66,992
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ...................................................6,524
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) .................................................................................70
From Highway Patrol Inspection Fund (1297) ......................................................................362
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) ..............................................................................596
From Veterans Health and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) .....................................456
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ..............................197,698
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) ....................................................................16,747
From Highway Patrol Academy Fund (1674) .......................................................................579
From Highway Patrol Traffic Records Fund (1758) ..............................................................122
From DNA Profiling Analysis Fund (1772) ........................................................ 215
Total ..............................................................................................................................$290,361
Section 14.200. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund
From Veterans Reinvestment Fund (1611) ................................................................$2,743,076

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 11
Section 14.205. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For the Missouri Disaster Medical Assistance Team
Personal Service ................................................................................................$175,000
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 215,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$390,000
Section 14.210. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For all allotments, grants, and contributions from federal and other
sources that are deposited in the State Treasury for the use of the
State Emergency Management Agency for alleviating distress
from disasters
From Missouri Disaster Fund (1663) .....................................................................$800,000,000
For matching funds for federal grants and for emergency assistance
expenses of the State Emergency Management Agency as
provided in Section 44.032, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................30,000,000
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Disaster Relief Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................86,000,000
For expenses of any City not within a county responding to a disaster for
which a presidential declaration has been requested by the
Governor, to provide relief associated with such disaster
From Disaster Relief Fund (1220) ....................................................................... 86,000,000
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,002,000,000
Section 14.215. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For the operation of institutional facilities, utilities, systems furniture,
and structural modifications
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$194,800
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................... 484,226
Total ..............................................................................................................................$679,026

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 12
Section 14.220. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For the purchase, transportation, and storage of food and food service
items, and operational expenses of food preparation facilities at
all correctional institutions
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,821,350
Section 14.225. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For contractual services for offender physical and mental health care
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,157,630
Section 14.230. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For community supervision centers
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 10.00 F.T.E.) ........................................$0
Section 14.235. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For paying overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$27,864,720
Section 14.240. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Office of the Director
For grant funding for the Crisis Counseling Program to provide services
related to presidential disaster declarations
Personal Service ................................................................................................$151,309
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,893,805
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) (Not to exceed
1.60 F.T.E.) ....................................................................................................$3,045,114
Section 14.242. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 13
For a psychology internship program
Personal Service ................................................................................................$218,192
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,500
From Mental Health Earnings Fund (1288) (Not to exceed 5.60 F.T.E.) .....................$228,692
Section 14.245. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$741,435
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................2,271,199
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .....................................607,662
For adult psychiatric services
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 58,335
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,678,631
Section 14.250. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For treatment of alcohol and drug abuse for payment of services to
Certified Community Behavioral Health Organizations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$883,410
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................1,288,779
From Mental Health Reinvestment Fund (1352) .........................................................6,600,000
For adult psychiatric services and community programs
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,716,534
For youth psychiatric services and community programs
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,514,628
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 7,837,300
Total .........................................................................................................................$26,840,651
Section 14.252. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 14
For outpatient competency restoration services authorized by Section
552.020, RSMo
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,473,223
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 1,578,597
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,051,820
Section 14.255. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Fulton State Hospital
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$75,458
Section 14.260. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Northwest Missouri Psychiatric Rehabilitation Center
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$165,716
Section 14.265. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Forensic Treatment Center
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$176,689
Section 14.270. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$70,734
Section 14.285. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
To pay the state operated Intermediate Care Facilities for
Individuals with Intellectual Disabilities (ICF/ID) provider tax
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$135,897
Section 14.290. To the Department of Mental Health

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 15
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For community programs, including long-term care transformation
initiatives and efforts for reimbursement of providers based on
integration of key identified outcomes that produce value-based
care delivery models to improve quality and efficiency of the
total care delivered to individuals
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .......................................$23,762,797
Section 14.295. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For a designated provider (including a provider that operates in
coordination with a team of health care professionals) or a health
team selected by an eligible individual with chronic conditions to
provide health home services, designed to coordinate care for
individuals with identified health risks and chronic health
conditions receiving DD HCBS services
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,231,506
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................9,740,678
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal
Fund (1159) .............................................................................................. 1,342,872
Total .........................................................................................................................$12,315,056
Section 14.300. To the Department of Mental Health
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to Federal
Funds
From Intermediate Care Facility Intellectually Disabled Reimbursement
Allowance Fund (1901) ......................................................................................$30,208
Section 14.305. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For providing consumer directed personal care assistance services at a
rate not to exceed sixty percent (60%) of the average monthly
Medicaid cost of nursing facility care, including payments to
providers for value-based payment initiatives, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and
Section 14.310 to allow flexibility within the Medicaid Home and
Community Based Services Program
Expense and Equipment

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 16
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$629,442
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund
(1143) ....................................................................................................... 27,424,255
Total .........................................................................................................................$28,053,697
Section 14.310. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Senior and Disability Services
For respite care, homemaker chore, personal care, assistive technology,
adult day care, AIDS, children's waiver services, home-delivered
meals, Programs of All Inclusive Care for the Elderly, the
Structured Family Caregiver Waiver, Brain Injury Waiver, other
related services, and program management under the Medicaid
fee-for-service and managed care programs, including payments
to providers for value-based payment initiatives, provided that
individuals eligible for or receiving nursing home care must be
given the opportunity to have those Medicaid dollars follow them
to the community to the extent necessary to meet their unmet
needs as determined by 19 CSR 30 81.030 and further be allowed
to choose the personal care program option, including the option
of assistive technology, in the community that best meets the
individuals' unmet needs, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between this section and Section 14.305 to allow
flexibility within the Medicaid Home and Community Based
Services Program, and further provided that individuals eligible
for the Medicaid Personal Care Option must be allowed to
choose, from among all the program options, that option which
best meets their unmet needs as determined by 19 CSR 30
81.030; and also be allowed to have their Medicaid funds follow
them to the extent necessary to meet their unmet needs whichever
option they choose. This language does not create any
entitlements not established by statute
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,687,520
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) .............. 82,001,904
Total .........................................................................................................................$90,689,424
Section 14.316. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For a grant to the Department of Mental Health

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 17
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury for substance
abuse disorder treatment and education programs as provided by
Article XIV, Section 2 of the Missouri Constitution, to the Mental
Health Reinvestment Fund, provided the state treasurer shall
invest monies in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested, and any interest and monies earned on such investments
shall be deposited to the credit of the Mental Health
Reinvestment Fund, and further provided that any monies
remaining in the Mental Health Reinvestment Fund at the end of
the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the General Revenue
Fund
From Health Reinvestment Fund (1640) ...................................................................$6,600,000
Section 14.317. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Regulation and Licensure
For the Nursing Home Staffing Campaign (NHSC) in partnership with
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid (CMS) to increase the
number of nurses working in nursing homes
Program Distribution
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) .................................................$2,649,459
Section 14.320. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the OA
Information Technology Federal Fund
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$5,468,361
Section 14.325. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the receipt and disbursement of refunds and incorrectly deposited
receipts to allow the over-collection of accounts receivables to be
paid back to the recipient, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between federal and other funds within this section
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146) ........................................................$200,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus Fund (2355) .............................750,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus 2021 Fund
(2456) ....................................................................................................... 200,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,150,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 18
Section 14.330. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For payments to counties and the City of St. Louis for the care and
maintenance of each delinquent or dependent child as provided
in Section 211.156, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$116,923
Section 14.335. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the income maintenance field staff and operations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,030,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 9,090,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$12,120,000
Section 14.340. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For income maintenance eligibility system updates and additional
resources to implement Public Law No. 119-21
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,044,653
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 22,971,458
Total .........................................................................................................................$32,016,111
Section 14.345. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For business enterprise programs for the blind
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$4,000,000
Section 14.350. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For room and board expenses for children placed in Qualified Residential
Treatment Program designated facilities, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within this
section
For placements in a Qualified Residential Treatment Program/non-
Institution for Mental Disease (QRTP/non-IMD) designated
facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,739,023
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................948,314

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 19
For placements in Qualified Residential Treatment Programs/Institution
for Mental Disease (QRTP/IMD) designated facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................582,501
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 439,151
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,708,989
Section 14.355. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Rural Health Transformation Program
From Rural Health Transformation Fund (1125) ...................................................$100,000,000
Section 14.360. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For pharmaceutical payments under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program, professional fees for pharmacists, and for a
comprehensive chronic care risk management program, provided
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection
and Sections 14.360, 14.370, 14.380, 14.385, 14.390, 14.395, and
14.400
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ..................................................................$101,874,626
Section 14.365. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the purpose of funding pharmaceutical payments under the Missouri
Rx Plan authorized by Sections 208.780 through 208.798, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$113,011
Section 14.370. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For physician services and related services including, but not limited to,
clinic and podiatry services, telemedicine services, physician-
sponsored services and fees, laboratory and x-ray services,
asthma related services, diabetes prevention and obesity related
services, services provided by chiropractic physicians, and
family planning services under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program, and for a comprehensive chronic care risk management
program, and Major Medical Prior Authorization, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 20
Sections 14.360, 14.370, 14.380, 14.385, 14.390, 14.395, and
14.400
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,699,304
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ......................................................................69,266,144
For payment of physician and related services to Certified Community
Behavioral Health Organizations (CCBHO), provided that
Applied Behavioral Analysis (ABA) services are included in the
CCBHO Prospective Payment System
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 18,904,867
Total .........................................................................................................................$95,870,315
Section 14.375. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For fees associated with third-party collections and other revenue
maximization cost avoidance fees
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$4,500,000
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ........................................... 4,500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,000,000
Section 14.380. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For funding long-term care services
For care in nursing facilities under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program and for contracted services to develop model policies
and practices that improve the quality of life for long-term care
residents, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this subsection and Sections 14.360, 14.370, 14.380,
14.385, 14.390, 14.395, and 14.400
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$26,645,465
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................ 49,296,410
Total .........................................................................................................................$75,941,875
Section 14.385. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For all other non-institutional services including, but not limited to,
rehabilitation, optometry, audiology, ambulance, non-emergency

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 21
medical transportation, durable medical equipment, and
eyeglasses under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service program, and
for rehabilitation services provided by residential treatment
facilities as authorized by the Children’s Division for children in
the care and custody of the Children’s Division, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and
Sections 14.360, 14.370, 14.380, 14.385, 14.390, 14.395, and
14.400
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$33,202,526
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................ 801,857
Total .........................................................................................................................$34,004,383
Section 14.390. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payment to comprehensive prepaid health care plans for the general
plan as provided by federal or state law or for payments to
programs authorized by the Frail Elderly Demonstration Project
Waiver as provided by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act
of 1990 (P.L.101-508, Section 4744) and by Section 208.152
(16), RSMo; provided that the department shall implement
programs or measures to achieve cost-savings through
emergency room services reform, and further provided that MO
HealthNet eligibles described in Section 501(a)(1)(D) of Title V
of the Social Security Act may voluntarily enroll in the Managed
Care Program, and further provided that the Department shall
direct its contracted actuary to develop an Aged, Blind, and
Disabled rate cell inside the MO HealthNet Managed Care
program to reflect the cost of those members choosing to be
enrolled in a managed care plan, and further provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
14.360, 14.370, 14.380, 14.385, 14.390, 14.395, and 14.400
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$48,753,380
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................ 74,260,641
Total .......................................................................................................................$123,014,021
Section 14.395. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For hospital care under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service program,
graduate medical education, and for a comprehensive chronic

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 22
care risk management program, provided that the MO HealthNet
Division shall track payments to out-of-state hospitals by
location, and further provided the department seek a waiver of
the institutions for mental disease (IMD) exclusion for inpatient
mental health treatment for MO HealthNet participants in
psychiatric hospitals pursuant to Section 12003 of the 21st
Century Cures Act with the state share through the federal
reimbursement allowance; and further provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
14.360, 14.370, 14.380, 14.385, 14.390, 14.395, and 14.400
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ....................................................................$10,599,248
For Safety Net Payments
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 29,487,659
Total .........................................................................................................................$40,086,907
Section 14.400. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For program distributions related to Section 36(c) of Article IV of the
Missouri Constitution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$73,911,339
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) ........................................343,843,374
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) .................................................435,065
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) .............................................423,042
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ...................................619,607
For payments to the Department of Mental Health for Community
Psychiatric Rehabilitation (CPR) services, Comprehensive
Substance Abuse Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR)
services, Targeted Case Management (TCM) for behavioral
health services, and Certified Community Behavioral Health
Organizations (CCBHO) for MO HealthNet participants and the
uninsured
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) ..........................................59,741,366
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ....................................................................................................... 6,637,930
Total .......................................................................................................................$485,611,723
Section 14.405. To the Department of Social Services

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 23
For payments to the Department of Mental Health for Community
Psychiatric Rehabilitation (CPR) services, Comprehensive
Substance Abuse Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR)
services, Targeted Case Management (TCM) for behavioral
health services, and Certified Community Behavioral Health
Organizations (CCBHO) for MO HealthNet participants and the
uninsured
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ....................................................................$47,690,432
Section 14.410. For the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For the payment of real property leases, utilities, systems furniture, and
structural modifications
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$9,160
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ...................................................................34,263
From DESE - Federal Fund (1105) ........................................................................................295
From Child Care and Development Block Grant - Federal Fund (1168) ...........................1,400
From Assistive Technology Federal Fund (1188) .................................................................744
From Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Fund (1559) ....................................524
From Charter Public School Commission Revolving Fund (1860) .......................................395
From Assistive Technology Loan Revolving Fund (1889) ...................................................225
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Expense and Equipment
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ..........................................................24,899
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ..............................................................4,206
For the Department of Revenue
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................13,497
For the Department of Revenue
For the State Lottery Commission
Expense and Equipment
From Lottery Enterprise Fund (1657) .................................................................................8,387
For the Office of Administration

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 24
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................17,085
For the Office of Administration
For the Ethics Commission
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................2,254
For the Department of Agriculture
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................6,315
From Department of Agriculture - Federal Fund (1133) .........................................................65
From Grain Inspection Fee Fund (1647) ............................................................................1,011
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ...............................................................................451
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ...............................................................................36
For the Department of Natural Resources
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................9,041
From DNR- Federal Fund (1140) .......................................................................................6,357
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ...........................................................612
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..............................................................................1,608
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) .............................................................560
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ...........................................................................1,670
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) ..................................................................179
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ..................................................................................................1,849
From Solid Waste Management Fund Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ..................................543
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .....................................................................2,739
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) .....................................................................................................396
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ..........................................................741
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) ....................................227
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ..................................................................................................4,739
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ....................................................................................2,447
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ........................................................................526
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..................................................................................2,629
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .............................................................................1,967

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 25
For the Department of Economic Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................................204
For the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Expense and Equipment
From Office of Public Counsel Fund (1508) ......................................................................1,886
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) ..............................................................................2,298
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552) ...............................................................................121
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) ................................................................................308
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) ............................................................................337
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) ................................................................17,662
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) ..................................................................40
For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................................437
From DOLIR - Commission on Human Rights - Federal Fund (1117) .................................206
From DOLIR Administrative Fund (1122) ..............................................................................79
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ....................................1,482
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) .......................................................................7,299
For the Department of Public Safety
Expense and Equipment
From State Emergency Management - Federal Fund (1145) .................................................149
From Veterans’ Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) .............................2,664
From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544) ...........................................2,269
For the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................3,668
From Department of Public Safety - Federal Fund (1152) ....................................................159
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................................21,442
For the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Gaming Commission
Expense and Equipment
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................................7,993

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 26
For the Missouri National Guard
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................................909
100 From Adjutant General - Federal Fund (1190) .................................................................21,848
101 From Federal Drug Seizure - Federal Fund (1194) ...............................................................432
102 For the Department of Corrections
103 Expense and Equipment
104 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................118,713
105 From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ..................................................................4,931
106 For the Department of Mental Health
107 Expense and Equipment
108 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................60,024
109 For the Department of Health and Senior Services
110 Expense and Equipment
111 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................65,693
112 From Department of Health and Senior Services - Federal Fund (1143) .........................57,263
113 For the Department of Social Services
114 Expense and Equipment
115 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................196,310
116 From Department of Social Services - Federal Fund (1610) ..........................................101,517
117 For the Lieutenant Governor
118 Expense and Equipment
119 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................4,689
120 From Missouri Arts Council Trust Fund (1262) .................................................................4,974
121 For the Attorney General
122 Expense and Equipment
123 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................31,164
124 From Attorney General - Federal Fund (1136) ...................................................................9,768
125 From Merchandising Practices Revolving Fund (1631) .....................................................9,353
126 From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) .......................................................................7,122
127 From Workers’ Compensation - Second Injury Fund (1653) .............................................7,122
128 From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) .....................................................................................144
129 From Missouri Office of Prosecution Services Fund (1680) ..............................................1,406

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 27
130 For the Secretary of State
131 Expense and Equipment
132 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................9,830
133 From Local Records Preservation Fund (1577) .....................................................................819
134 For the State Auditor
135 Expense and Equipment
136 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................1,262
137 For the Judiciary
138 Expense and Equipment
139 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................118,559
140 From Judiciary- Federal Fund (1137) ....................................................................................409
141 From Judiciary Education and Training Fund (1847) .......................................... 2,607
142 Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,071,613
Section 14.415. For the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For operation of state-owned facilities, utilities, systems furniture, and
structural modifications
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$9,314
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) .................................................................191,406
From DESE - Federal Fund (1105) ...................................................................................12,517
From Child Care and Development Block Grant - Federal Fund (1168) .........................19,621
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................5,385
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ..........................................................28,570
For the Department of Revenue
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................101,793
For the Office of Administration
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................229,271

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 28
From Children’s Trust Fund (1694) .......................................................................................543
For the Department of Agriculture
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................4,011
From Department of Agriculture - Federal Fund (1133) .......................................................788
From Animal Health Laboratory Fee Fund (1292) ................................................................781
From Animal Care Reserve Fund (1295)...............................................................................115
From Commodity Council Merchandising Fund (1406) .........................................................63
From Single - Purpose Animal Facilities Loan Program Fund (1408) ....................................75
From State Milk Inspection Fees Fund (1645) ........................................................................83
From Grain Inspection Fees Fund (1647) ...........................................................................7,712
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ............................................................................2,409
From Missouri Wine and Grape Fund (1787) ........................................................................204
From Agriculture Development Fund (1904) ..........................................................................37
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ..........................................................................5,905
For the Department of Natural Resources
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................36,107
From DNR - Federal Fund (1140) ......................................................................................5,753
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ........................................................2,620
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ...........................................................................2,509
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ................................................................................................10,818
From Solid Waste Management Fund Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ...............................2,274
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .....................................................................2,492
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) ......................................................82
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) .......................................................................................................69
From Natural Resources Protection Fund Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ................................................................................................10,068
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ........................................................................703
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ......................................................................623
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..................................................................................6,919
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) ...........................................................................10,620
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) ........................................................................218
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ..........................................................................................22

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 29
For the Department of Economic Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................5,060
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) .......................................1,770
From Department of Economic Development Administrative
Fund (1547) ................................................................................................................604
For the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Expense and Equipment
From Division of Credit Unions Fund (1548) .......................................................................638
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) ............................................................................25,211
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552) ...............................................................................710
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) .............................................................................9,601
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) ................................................................26,481
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .............................................................5,526
For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................9,886
From DOLIR - Commission on Human Rights - Federal Fund (1117) ..............................3,842
From DOLIR Administrative Fund (1122) .........................................................................9,529
From Division of Labor Standards - Federal Fund (1186) ....................................................153
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ..................................62,446
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) .....................................................................83,198
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ..............................................................1,443
For the Department of Public Safety
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................9,367
From Veterans’ Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) ...........................10,701
From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544) .........................................16,766
For the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................13,296
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................................66,277
For the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Gaming Commission

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 30
Expense and Equipment
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ..........................................................................15,463
For the Department of Corrections
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................200,447
For the Department of Mental Health
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................113,387
100 From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................................22,831
101 From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) .....................................................................................163
102 For the Department of Health and Senior Services
103 Expense and Equipment
104 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................97,731
105 From Department of Health and Senior Services - Federal Fund (1143) .......................105,232
106 For the Department of Social Services
107 Expense and Equipment
108 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................956,159
109 From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199) ........................................19,482
110 From Department of Social Services - Federal Fund (1610) ..........................................188,148
111 From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..................................................................................5,340
112 From Department of Social Services Educational Improvement
113 Fund (1620) ................................................................................................................850
114 For the Governor
115 Expense and Equipment
116 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................23,358
117 For the Lieutenant Governor
118 Expense and Equipment
119 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................1,206
120 For the General Assembly
121 Expense and Equipment
122 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................41,794
123 For the Secretary of State

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 31
124 Expense and Equipment
125 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................39,786
126 From Secretary of State’s Technology Trust Fund Account (1266) ......................................284
127 From Local Records Preservation Fund (1577) .....................................................................154
128 From Investor Education and Protection Fund (1829) ..........................................................583
129 For the State Auditor
130 Expense and Equipment
131 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................39,128
132 For the Attorney General
133 Expense and Equipment
134 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................34,787
135 From Attorney General - Federal Fund (1136) .................................................................16,886
136 From Natural Resources Protection Water Pollution Permit Fee
137 Subaccount Fund (1568) ............................................................................................504
138 From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) .......................................................................8,657
139 From Workers’ Compensation Second Injury Fund (1653) ...............................................8,660
140 From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) .....................................................................................211
141 For the State Treasurer
142 Expense and Equipment
143 From State Treasurer’s General Operations Fund (1164) ...................................................4,099
144 For the Judiciary
145 Expense and Equipment
146 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 5,882
147 Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,026,217
Section 14.420. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For the operation of institutional facilities, utilities, systems furniture,
and structural modifications
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$189,251
For the Department of Mental Health
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................964,478

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 32
For the Department of Social Services
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................156,152
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 35,859
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,345,740
PART 2
Section 14.2005. To the Office of Administration
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The department shall prioritize existing enterprise agreements
when considering procurement or additional functionality for any
information technology for citizen engagement or supporting
state workers and programs. Prior to obligating the state to any
ongoing IT expense, including subscription or maintenance costs,
departments shall evaluate the state’s existing enterprise
agreements, including enterprise-wide licensing and other IT
assets. Prior to purchasing a new subscription for any
functionality described in this section, departments shall first
consider the state enterprise agreements in existence at the time
of procurement. If such an existing enterprise agreement is
appropriate for the functionality, it shall be given preference in
the procurement. Additionally, departments shall seek to adopt
functionality on any platform with an enterprise-wide agreement
with the state prior to incurring costs for additional platforms or
programs. All IT procurements processed through the Office of
Administration shall include a statement outlining compliance
with this section.
Section 14.2010. To the Department of Public Safety
In reference to Sections 14.170 through and including 14.180 of
Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be spent for any flight on a state aircraft where an
elected official will be on board without a flight plan being made
publicly available via a global aviation data services organization
that operates both a website and mobile application which
provides free flight tracking of both private and commercial
aircraft.

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 33
Section 14.2015. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Sections 14.245 and 14.250 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025, with the
exception of Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics, for
which no funds shall be expended in furtherance of a Medicare
Economic Index rate increase of 2.5% greater than the rate in
effect on January 1, 2025, with the exception of revenue
maximization initiatives, and further excepting rates of cost-
based and actuarially sound rate changes for Comprehensive
Substance Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR) and
Compulsive Gambling; and further excepting providers of
children’s residential services classified as an Institution of
Mental Disease (IMD) Qualified Residential Treatment Program
(QRTP) or as a non-IMD QRTP, for which no funds shall be
expended in furtherance of rates greater than: $194.47 per day for
Level II, $239.16 per day for Level III, $253.80 per day for Level
IV.
Section 14.2020. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Section 14.290 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of waiver slots
assigned on July 1, 2025, except for: 400 additional waiver slots
for Crisis Residential Services, 54 additional slots for individuals
transitioning from Nursing Homes, 48 additional slots for
children transitioning from DSS Children's Division funded
waiver slots, 500 additional waiver slots for the Community
Support Waiver for prevention of in-home wait list, 200
additional waiver slots for Partnership for Hope services, and 83
additional waiver slots for children transitioning out of the
MoCDD Waiver.
Section 14.2025. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Section 14.295 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of a DD Health Home
rate of $105.90 PMPM.
Section 14.2030. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to Sections 14.305 and 14.310 of Part 1 of this act:

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 34
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025, except Private
Duty Nursing rates for which no funds shall be expended in
furtherance of provider rates for Private Duty Nursing greater
than a rate of $15.20 per fifteen-minute unit of service, and
further excepting provider reassessment services rates, for which
no funds shall be expended in furtherance of rates greater than
$100 per assessment, unless such provider is enrolled in the
Value Based Purchasing Reassessment Program, and further
excepting the Medicaid Home-Delivered Meals rate for which no
funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates for
Medicaid Home-Delivered Meals greater than $7.14 per meal.
Section 14.2035. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to Section 14.317 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended for Certified Nursing Assistant
(CNA) training reimbursement greater than $1,500 per enrollee.
Section 14.2040. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 14.330 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of reimbursement rates
greater than $17 per day.
Section 14.2045. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 14.380 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of nursing facility
provider rates greater than the rebased rate, in the aggregate,
determined by the FY2022 nursing facility cost reports, excepting
case mix index adjustments and value-based payment
adjustments. No funds shall be expended in furtherance of home
health provider rates greater than $12.42 per visit of the rate in
effect on January 1, 2024. No funds shall be expended for
Certified Nursing Assistant (CNA) training reimbursement
greater than $1,500 per enrollee.
Section 14.2050. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 14.390 of Part 1 of this act:

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 35
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of managed care
contract rates greater than the lower bound actuarial soundness
rate.
PART 3
Section 14.3005. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Department shall provide written notification prior to
submission to the federal government of state plans and state plan
amendments, and quarterly financial reports, to the House Budget
and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs. The Department
shall include in the notification the actual documents submitted
to the federal government, as well as the federal government’s
responses when received.
Section 14.3010. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Department shall provide notification and correspondence
from the federal government of non-compliance with federal
programs or grants to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs.
Section 14.3015. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Department shall provide written notification of spend plans
and spend plan amendments to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs prior to submission to the
federal government and prior to expenditure of such funds.
Section 14.3020. To the Department of Mental Health
In reference to Sections 14.235 through and including 14.300 in
of Part 1 of this act:
The Department shall provide monthly reports to the House
Budget and Senate Appropriations Committee Chairs for each
DMH Medicaid waiver, large service type by waiver, and

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 36
targeted case management costs: 1) The actual federal and state
share expenditures by appropriation and fund, number of waiver
slots assigned, average cost per slot, estimated current fiscal year
costs, estimated full fiscal year costs; 2) The actual federal and
state share expenditures by appropriation and fund, number of
new waiver slots assigned in FY 2026, average cost per slot,
estimated current fiscal year costs, estimated full fiscal year
costs; and 3) The number of individuals presenting for service
that have not been assigned a waiver slot, estimated current fiscal
year federal and state share costs if they were to be assigned,
estimated full fiscal year costs if they were to be assigned.
Section 14.3025. To the Department of Mental Health and the
Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Departments shall provide written notification and
correspondence from the federal government of non-compliance
with federal programs or grants to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs.
Section 14.3030. To the Department of Mental Health and the
Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Departments shall provide written documentation on rate
setting reports, rate studies, time surveys, time studies, and
random moment time studies; and the federal and state share
fiscal impact estimates, to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs.
Section 14.3035. To the Department of Mental Health and the
Department of Health and Senior Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Department shall provide copies of financial reports,
maintenance of effort reports, and public assistance cost
allocation plans submitted to the federal government and
supporting cash on hand reports, by grant, to the House Budget
and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs.

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 37
Section 14.3040. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 14.390 of Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
Contract changes shall be provided in writing, prior to
submission to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services,
to the House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee
Chairs.
Section 14.3045. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Department shall provide written notification, prior to
submission to the federal government, of state plans and state
plan amendments, grant applications, and Medicaid waivers to
the House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs.
The Department shall include in the notification the actual
documents submitted to the federal government, as well as the
federal government’s responses when received.
Section 14.3050. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Department shall provide written documentation of rate
setting, rate studies, time surveys, time studies, and random
moment time studies, and the federal and state share fiscal impact
estimates, including Title IV-E Foster Care eligibility and
participation rates to the House Budget and Senate Appropriation
Committee Chairs.
Section 14.3055. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Department shall provide written notification and
correspondence from the federal government of non-compliance
with federal programs or grants to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs.
Section 14.3060. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Department shall provide copies of financial reports and
public assistance cost allocation plans submitted to the federal
government and supporting cash on hand reports, by grant, to the
House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs.

SS SCS HCS HB 2014 38
Section 14.3065. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 of this act to said department:
The Department shall provide monthly expenditures and
projections for Child Welfare programs and Medicaid programs
for the current state fiscal year and next state fiscal year to the
House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs on a
monthly basis.
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund (10.00 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$516,821,860
Federal Funds (1.60 F.T.E) ...................................................................................1,870,192,774
Other Funds (1,148.44 F.T.E) ............................................................................... 670,296,305
Total (1,160.04 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$3,057,310,939
